en: Almond oils
da: Mandelolier
de: Mandelöle
es: Aceites de almendras
fr: Huiles d'amande
hr: Bademova ulja
it: Olio di
ja: アーモンドオイル
lt: Migdolų aliejai
nl: Amandeloliën
sv: Mandeloljor, Mandelolja
zh: 杏仁油

en: Hazelnut oils
da: Hasselnødolier, Hasselnøddeolier
de: Haselnussöle
es: Aceites de avellanas
fi: hasselpähkinäöljyt
fr: Huiles de noisette
hr: Ulja lješnjaka
it: Olio di nocciole
ja: ヘーゼルナッツオイル
lt: Lazdyno riešutų aliejai
nl: Hazelnootoliën
pt: Óleos de avelãs
tr: Fındık yağı
zh: 榛子油

en: Macadamia oils
bg: Олио от макадамия
es: Aceites de macadamia, Aceites de nuez de macadamia
fr: Huiles de noix de macadamia
hr: Ulja makadamije
it: Olio di macadamia, olio della noce macadamia
ja: マカダミアナッツオイル
lt: Makadamijų aliejai
nl: Macadamiaoliën

en: Pecan oils, Pecannut oils
bg: Олио от пекан
da: Pekannødolier, Pekannøddeolier
es: Aceites de nuez pecana
fr: Huiles de noix de pécan
hr: Pekan ulja
it: Olio di noci pecan
ja: ピーカンナッツオイル
lt: Pekanų aliejai
nl: Pecanoliën

en: Pine nut oils
da: Pinjekerneolier
es: Aceites de piñones
fr: Huiles de pignons de pin
hr: Ulja pinjola
it: Olio di pinoli
nl: Pijnboompitoliën

en: Pistachio oils
bg: Олио от шамфъстък
da: Pistacieolier
de: Pistazienöle
es: Aceites de pistacho
fr: Huiles de pistache
hr: Ulja od pistacija
it: Olio di pistacchio
ja: ピスタチオオイル
lt: Pistacijų aliejai
nl: Pistacheoliën

en: Walnut oils
bg: Орехово олио
da: Valnødolier, Valnøddeolier
de: Walnussöle
es: Aceites de nueces
fi: saksanpähkinäöljyt
fr: Huiles de noix, huile de noix
hr: Ulja od oraha
it: Olio di noci
ja: ウォールナッツオイル, くるみオイル
lt: Graikinių riešutų aliejai
nl: Walnootoliën
sv: Valnötsoljor, Valnötsolja
zh: 核桃油

en: Flavoured olive oils
da: Olivenolier med smag
fr: Huiles d'olive aromatisées
hr: Aromatizirana maslinova ulja
nl: Gearomatiseerde olijfolies

en: Citrus flavoured olive oils
da: Olivenolier med citrussmag, Olivenolier med smag af citrus
fr: Huiles d'olive aromatisées à la citron
hr: Maslinova ulja s okusom citrusa
nl: Gearomatiseerde olijfolies met citrus

en: Spiced flavoured olive oils
fr: Huiles d'olive aromatisées épicées
hr: Začinjena aromatizirana maslinova ulja
nl: Pikant gearomatiseerde olijfolies

en: Truffle flavoured olive oils
fr: Huiles d'olive aromatisées à la truffe
hr: Maslinova ulja s okusom tartufa
nl: Gearomatiseerde olijfolies met truffel

en: Herb flavoured olive oils
fr: Huiles d'olive aromatisées aux herbes
hr: Maslinova ulja s okusom bilja
nl: Gearomatiseerde olijf olies met kruiden

en: Olive oils
bg: Зехтин, Дървено масло
ca: Olis d'oliva
da: Olivenolier, Olivenolie
de: Olivenöle, Olivenöl
es: Aceites de oliva, Aceites de oliva y de orujo de oliva
fi: oliiviöljyt
fr: Huiles d'olive
he: שמני זית
hr: maslinova ulja, maslinovo ulje
hu: Olívaolajok
it: Olio di oliva
ja: オリーブオイル, オリーブ油
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai
nb: Olivenoljer
nl: Olijfoliën, Olijfolie
pl: Oliwa z oliwek
pt: Azeite de oliva
ru: Оливковое масло
sv: Olivoljor, olivolja
th: น้ำมันมะกอก
tr: Zeytinyağı
zh: 橄榄油

en: Virgin olive oils
bg: Върджин зехтини
ca: Olis d’oliva verge
da: Jomfruolivenolier
de: Native Olivenöle, Natives Olivenöl
es: Aceites de oliva virgen, Aceites de oliva vírgenes
fi: neitsytoliiviöljyt
fr: Huiles d'olive vierges
hr: Djevičanska maslinova ulja
hu: Szűz olívaolajok, Szűz olívaolaj
it: Olio vergine di oliva
ja: ヴァージンオリーブオイル
lt: Gryni alyvuogių aliejai
nb: Virgin olivenoljer
nl: Virgin olijfoliën
pl: Oliwa z oliwek virgin
sv: Jungfruolivoljor, Virgin olivoljor, Jungfruoljor
zh: 初榨橄榄油

en: Extra-virgin olive oils, Extra virgin olive oil
bg: Маслиново масло екстра върджин, Дървено масло екстра върджин, Зехтин екстра върджин
ca: Oli d'oliva verge extra
de: Native Olivenöle Extra, Natives Olivenöl Extra, Olivenöl extra nativ
es: Aceites de oliva virgen extra, Aceite de oliva virgen extra
fi: Ekstra-neitsytoliiviöljyt, Extra-neitsytoliiviöljyt
fr: Huiles d'olive vierges extra, Huile d'olive vierge extra
hr: ekstra djevičanska maslinova ulja, ekstra djevičansko maslinovo ulje
hu: Extra szűz olívaolajok, Extra szűz olívaolaj
it: Olio extra vergine di oliva
ja: エキストラヴァージンオリーブオイル
lt: Pirmo spaudimo alyvuogių aliejai, ypač grynas alyvuogių aliejus
nb: Extra virgin olivenoljer
nl: Extra vierge olijfoliën
pl: Oliwa z oliwek extra virgin
pt: Azeites virgem extra
ru: Оливковое масло первого отжима
sv: Extra jungfruolivoljor, Extra jungfruoljor
zh: 特级初榨橄榄油

en: Refined olive oils
de: Raffinierte Olivenöle, Raffiniertes Olivenöl
es: Aceites de oliva refinados, Aceites de oliva a partir de aceites de oliva refinados y aceites de oliva vírgenes
fr: Huiles d'olive raffinées, Huiles d'olive-composées d'huiles d'olive raffinées et d'huiles d'olive vierges
hr: Rafinirana maslinova ulja
hu: Finomított olívaolajok
it: Olio d'oliva raffinato
lt: Rafinuoti alyvuogių aliejai
nl: Geraffineerde olijfoliën

en: Olive pomace oils
es: Aceites de orujo de oliva
fr: Huiles de grignons d'olive
hr: Ulja komine masline
it: Olio di sansa di oliva
nl: Vruchtenpulp-olijfoliën

en: Olive oil mixes
fr: Mélanges de huiles d'olives
hr: Mješavine maslinovog ulja
nl: Olijfoliemelanges, olijfoliemixes

en: Olive oils from France, French olive oils, Olive oil from France, French olive oil
bg: Френско дървено масло, френски зехтин
da: Olivenolier fra Frankrig, Franske olivenolier
de: Olivenöle aus Frankreich, Französische Olivenöle
es: Aceites de oliva de Francia
fi: Ranskalaiset oliiviöljyt
fr: Huiles d'olive de France
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Francuske
hu: Olívaolajok Franciaországból
it: Olio d'oliva francese
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai iš Prancūzijos
nl: Olijfoliën uit Frankrijk, Olijfolies uit Frankrijk, Franse olijfoliën, Franse olijfolies
sv: Olivoljor från Frankrike, Franska olivoljor

en: Olive oils from Aix-en-Provence, Olive oil from Aix-en-Provence
fr: Huile d'olive d'Aix-en-Provence
hr: Maslinova ulja iz aix-en-provencea
nl: Olijfoliën uit Aix-en-Provence, Olijfolies uit Aix-en-Provence